Utah statutes.
31A-14-201.   Application.
(1) (a)  An incorporated person, other than a foreign health maintenance
organization, authorized as an insurer in another jurisdiction in the United
States may apply under this section for a certificate of authority as an
insurer in this state.
(b)  An alien insurer that is incorporated may apply under this section for a
certificate of authority as an insurer in this state.
(2)  An applicant for a certificate of authority under this section shall:
(a)  use the forms prescribed by the commissioner; and
(b)  provide the information and documents the commissioner requests,
including the following:
(i)  a copy of the applicant's articles and bylaws;
(ii)  financial statements for the most recent complete fiscal year, with an
explanation of the bases of all valuations and computations, in the detail
reasonably required by the commissioner;
(iii)  a summary, as detailed as the commissioner reasonably requires, of the
applicant's financial history for:
(A)  the preceding ten years; or
(B)  the entire period of the applicant's existence if less than ten years;
(iv) for each of the applicant's current or proposed directors and principal
officers:
(A)  the name of the director or principal officer;
(B)  the address of the director or principal officer; and
(C)  the occupation for the preceding ten years of the director or principal
officer;
(v)  for an alien insurer:
(A)  the name of its United States manager, the manager's addresses and
occupations for the preceding ten years; and
(B)  if the manager is a corporation, the names, addresses, and occupations of
its directors and principal officers, and its most recent detailed financial
statements;
(vi)  a schedule listing:
(A)  all jurisdictions in which applicant has done or has been authorized to
conduct an insurance business during the preceding ten years;
(B)  all jurisdictions in which the applicant has applied for authorization to
conduct an insurance business during the preceding ten years, and the dates
and results of those applications;
(C)  all jurisdictions from which the applicant has withdrawn from conducting
an insurance business during the preceding ten years, and the reasons for its
withdrawals; and
(D)  the name of and the circumstances surrounding any officer, director, or
controlling shareholder of the corporation ever being subject to a:
(I)  felony indictment or conviction; or
(II)  civil, criminal, or administrative action alleging fraud;
(vii)  a summary description of the applicant's present business operations,
including the coverages written and the states and countries in which it does
business;
(viii)  a list of any statements, reports, or other documents that have,
within the last five years, been generally transmitted or distributed to or
among the insurer's creditors, shareholders, members, subscribers, or
policyholders;
(ix)  if the applicant has been in the insurance business for less than ten
years, a summary of the past and a projection of the anticipated operating
results at the end of each year of the first ten years of operation, based,
where known, on actual data and otherwise on reasonable assumptions of loss
experience, premium and other income, operating expenses, and acquisition
costs;
(x)  a statement that organizational and promotional expenses have been paid,
and that organizational procedures required by the insurer's domiciliary
authority are complete;
(xi)  a statement from the domiciliary regulatory authority and the state of
entry into the United States, if any, that so far as known, the applicant is
sound and there are no legitimate objections to its proposed operations in
this state;
(xii)  the plan for conducting an insurance business in this state, including:
(A)  the geographical area where business is to be conducted;
(B)  the types of insurance to be written;
(C)  the proposed general marketing methods;
(D)  the proposed method for establishing premium rates; and
(E)  copies of the policy and application forms to be used in this state;
(xiii)  any other information the commissioner reasonably requires;
(xiv)  authorization to the commissioner to make inquiry of any person about
the applicant, its manager under a management contract, its attorney in fact,
its general agents, and any of the officers, directors, or shareholders of any
of them designated by the commissioner; and
(xv)  written agreement by the applicant and any other designated persons that
in the absence of actual malice, no communication made in response to any
inquiry under Subsection (2)(b)(xiv) will subject the person making it to an
action for damages for defamation brought by the applicant, the designated
person, or a legal representative of either.
(3)  No action for damages for defamation lies even in the absence of this
agreement.
(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), the commissioner may exempt an applicant
for a certificate of authority from providing the information described in
Subsection (2) if the commissioner finds that the information will not be
helpful in making the decision of whether to issue a certificate of authority.
